tr: Tekne dokuma mekiği atkı çıkış tipi: Alttan beslemeli; Orta yuva; Uçtan beslemeli; Delikli; Açık yan; Diğer
el: Τύπος εξόδου του υφαδιού από το σαΐτι της ύφανσης: Τροφοδοσία από κάτω; Κεντρική υποδοχή; Τροφοδοσία από το άκρο; Οπή; Ανοιχτή πλευρά; Άλλο
nb: Båtveving skyttelvev utgangstype: Bunnmatet; Midtspor; Endematet; Malje; Åpen side; Annet
en: Boat weaving shuttle weft exit type: Bottom feed; Center slot; End feed; Eyelet; Open side; Other
zh-TW: 船梭緯線出口類型: 底部出線; 中央槽; 尾端出線; 穿線孔; 側面開口; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta izhoda tkalskega čolnička z votkovnim navitkom: Spodnje podajanje; Sredinska reža; Končno podajanje; Ušesce; Odprta stran; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ útkového výstupu pre tkáčsky člnok: Spodné podávanie; Stredový otvor; Koncové podávanie; Očko; Otvorená strana; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de ieșire a firului din suveica tip barcă pentru țesut: Alimentare inferioară; Fantă centrală; Alimentare la capăt; Ochet; Latură deschisă; Altele
fi: Sukkulan kuteen ulostulotyyppi: Alasyöttö; Keskiaukko; Päätysyöttö; Silmukka; Avoin sivu; Muu
it: Tipo di uscita della trama della navetta per la tessitura di barche: Alimentazione inferiore; Fessura centrale; Alimentazione terminale; Occhiello; Lato aperto; Altro
nl: Bootweefschuif inslaguitgangstype: Ondertoevoer; Middensleuf; Eindtoevoer; Oogje; Open zijde; Overige
pt-BR: Tipo de saída da trama em teares de lançadeira tipo barco: Alimentação inferior; Fenda central; Alimentação lateral; Ilhós; Lado aberto; Outros
pl: Typ wyjścia wątku w czółenku łódkowym: Wyprowadzenie dolne; Szczelina środkowa; Wyprowadzenie końcowe; Oczko; Otwarty bok; Inne
ko: 보트형 셔틀 씨실 배출 방식: 하단 급사; 중앙 슬롯; 끝면 급사; 아일릿; 개방형 측면; 기타
ja: ボート織りシャトル緯糸出口タイプ: ボトムフィード; センタースロット; エンドフィード; アイレット; オープンサイド; その他
cs: Typ výstupu útkové příze z tkalcovského člunku: Spodní odvíjení; Středová štěrbina; Koncové odvíjení; Očko; Otevřená strana; Jiné
es: Tipo de salida de trama de la lanzadera tipo bote: Alimentación inferior; Ranura central; Alimentación de extremo; Ojal; Lado abierto; Otro
th: แบบทางออกของด้ายพุ่งในกระสวยทอผ้าแบบเรือ: จ่ายด้ายด้านล่าง; ช่องกลาง; จ่ายด้ายปลายกระสวย; รูตาไก่; เปิดข้าง; อื่นๆ
da: Hvordan islætstråden føres ud af væveskytten: Fremføring fra bunden; Centeråbning; Fremføring fra enden; Øje; Åben side; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de saída de trama da lançadeira para tecelagem tipo barco: Alimentação inferior; Ranhura central; Alimentação final; Ilhó; Lado aberto; Outro
bg-BG: Начин на излизане на вътъка от совалката при лодков тъкачен стан: Долно подаване; Централен прорез; Крайно подаване; Ухо; Отворена страна; Друго
lt-LT: Laivinio audimo šaudyklės ataudų išėjimo tipas: Tiekimas iš apačios; Centrinis lizdas; Tiekimas iš galo; Ąselė; Atviras šonas; Kitas
sv: Skyttelvävning utgång: Undermatad; Mittskåra; Ändmatad; Öljett; Öppen sida; Annan
ru: Тип выхода уточной нити из ткацкого челнока: Нижняя подача; Центральная прорезь; Торцевая подача; Глазок; Открытая сторона; Другое
zh-CN: 织布梭纬纱出口类型: 底部出纬; 中心槽口; 端部出纬; 孔眼; 侧面开口; 其他
fr: Type de sortie de la trame de la navette de tissage: Alimentation par le bas; Fente centrale; Alimentation par l'extrémité; Œillet; Côté ouvert; Autre
vi: Loại thoát sợi ngang của con thoi dệt thuyền: Cấp sợi dưới; Khe giữa; Cấp sợi cuối; Lỗ xỏ dây; Mở một bên; Khác
de: Schussfadenaustrittstyp des Webschiffchens: Fadenzufuhr von unten; Mittelschlitz; Fadenzufuhr vom Ende; Öse; Offene Seite; Sonstige
hr-HR: Tip izlaza za potku čamca za tkanje brodova: Donji dovod; Središnji utor; Dovod na kraju; Ušica; Otvorena strana; Ostalo
hu: Csónakvetélő vetülékfonal-kilépési típusa: Alsó kivezetés; Középső rés; Végkivezetés; Fűzőlyuk; Nyitott oldal; Egyéb